en: pizza seasoning
al: erëza të picês
cs: ochucující složka Pizza
hr: začinska mješavina s okusom pizze
hu: pizza ízesítés
pl: przyprawa o smaku pizzy
ro: condiment Pizza
ru: вкусоароматическая добавка Пицца
sr: mešavina za aromatizovanje sa ukusom pice
uk: приправа для пици на

en: tarragon flavouring
de: Tarragon-Aroma
es: aroma de estragón
fi: rakuuna-aromi
fr: arôme d'estragon
hr: aroma estragona
hu: tárkony aroma
it: aroma di dragoncello
nl: dragonaroma
ro: aromă de tarhon

en: natural tarragon flavouring
de: natürliches Estragonaroma, natürliches Estragon-Aroma
es: aroma natural de estragón
fi: luontainen rakuuna-aromi
fr: arôme naturel d'estragon, arome naturel d'estragon
hr: prirodna aroma estragona
hu: természetes tárkony aroma
it: aroma naturale di dragoncello

fr: arôme naturel d'estragon avec autres arômes naturels
fi: luontainen rakuuna-aromi ja muut luontaiset aromit

fr: arôme naturel de sucre roux
es: aroma natural de azúcar moreno
hu: természetes barna cukor aroma
it: Aroma naturale di zucchero di canna
nl: natuurlijk bruine suikeraroma

en: natural fruits flavouring
de: natürliches Fruchtaroma
es: aroma natural de fruta, aroma natural de frutas
fi: luontainen hedelmäaromi
fr: arôme naturel de fruit, arômes naturels de fruit
hr: prirodne voćne arome
hu: természetes gyümölcsaroma, természetes gyümölcs aroma
it: aroma naturale di frutta

en: natural chicken flavouring
de: natürliches Hühnerfleischaroma, natürliches Hühnerfleisch-Aroma
es: aroma natural de pollo
fi: luontainen kana-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de poulet, arôme naturel de poule
hr: prirodna aroma za piletinu
hu: természetes csirke aroma
it: aroma naturale di pollo

en: natural cinammon flavouring
de: natürliches Zimtaroma
fi: luontainen kaneliaromi
fr: arôme naturel de cannelle
hr: prirodna aroma cimeta
hu: természetes fahéj aroma
it: aroma naturale di cannella
pl: naturalny aromat cynamonowy

en: natural oregano flavouring
de: natürliches Oreganoaroma
es: aroma natural de orégano
fi: luontainen oreganoaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'origan
hr: prirodna aroma origana
hu: természetes oregánó aroma
it: aroma naturale di origano
pl: naturalny aromat oregano

en: natural elderberry flavouring
bg: естествен аромат на бъз
de: natürliches Holunderaroma
es: aroma natural de saúco
fr: arôme naturel de sureau
hr: prirodna aroma bazge
hu: természetes bodza aroma
pl: naturalny aromat z czarnego bzu

en: apple flavouring
bg: ароматизант ябълка
de: Apfelgeschmack, Apfelsaftaroma
es: esencia de manzana
fi: omena-aromi
fr: arôme de pomme
hr: aroma jabuke
hu: alma aroma
it: aroma (mela), aroma (mele), aroma di mele, aroma di mela
pl: aromat jabłkowy

en: natural apple flavouring
de: natürliches Apfelaroma, natürliches Apfel-Aroma
es: Saborizante de manzana natural
fi: luontainen omena-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de pomme, arôme naturel de jus de pomme
hr: prirodna aroma jabuke
hu: természetes alma aroma
is: náttúruleg eplabragðefni
it: aroma naturale di mela
nb: naturlig eplesmak
nl: natuurlijk appelaroma
pl: naturalny aromat jabłkowy

fr: arôme naturel d'ananas
de: natürliches Ananasaroma
es: aroma natural de piña
it: aroma naturale di ananas
nl: natuurlijk ananasaroma
pl: naturalny aromat ananasowy
pt: sabor natural de abacaxi
ru: натуральный аромат ананаса

en: pear flavouring
de: Birnenaroma
es: aroma de pera
fi: päärynäaromi
fr: arôme de poire
hr: aroma kruške
hu: körte aroma
it: aroma di pera
nl: perenaroma
pl: aromat gruszkowy
pt: sabor de pera
ru: грушевый аромат
sv: päronarom

en: natural pear flavouring
de: natürliches Birnenaroma
es: sabor natural de pera
fi: luontainen päärynäaromi
fr: arôme naturel de poire
hr: prirodna aroma kruške
hu: természetes körte aroma
it: aroma naturale di pera
nl: natuurlijk perenaroma
pl: naturalny aromat gruszkowy

en: peach flavouring
de: Pfirsicharoma, Pfirsich-Aroma
es: sabor de durazno
fi: persikka-aromi
fr: arôme de pêche
hr: aroma breskve
hu: őszibarack aroma
it: aroma di pesca
nl: perzikaroma
pl: aromat brzoskwiniowy

en: natural peach flavouring
de: Natürlicher Pfirsischgeschmack, natürliches Pfirsicharoma, natürliches Pfirsich-Aroma
es: sabor natural melocotón, sabor natural durazno, sabor natural a durazno
fi: luontainen persikka-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de pêche
hr: prirodna aroma breskve
hu: természetes őszibarack aroma
it: aroma naturale di pesca
pl: naturalny aromat brzoskwiniowy

en: pepper flavouring
de: Pfeffergewürz, Gewürzpfeffer
es: aroma de pimienta
fi: pippuriaromi
fr: arôme de poivre
hr: aroma papra
hu: bors aroma
it: aroma di pepe
nl: peperaroma
pl: aromat pieprzu
sv: peppararom

en: paprika flavouring
bg: пипер аромат
de: Paprika-Aroma
es: aroma de pimentón
fi: paprika-aromi
fr: arôme de paprika
hr: paprika aroma
hu: paprika aroma
it: aroma di paprika
nl: paprika-aroma
pl: aromat papryki, aromat paprykowy
sv: paprikaarom

fr: arôme naturel de pomme avec autres arômes naturels
fi: luontainen omena-aromi ja muut luontaiset aromit
pl: naturalny aromat jabłkowy z innymi naturalnymi aromatami